pt-BR: Tipo de pino compatível: Alfinetes de blocagem; Bloqueadores/pentes de tricô; Não aceita alfinetes; Sem alfinetes (pesos/clipes); Alfinetes antiferrugem; Alfinetes em T; Outro
en: Compatible pin type: Blocking pins; Knit blockers/combs; Not pin-able; Pin-free (weights/clips); Rustproof pins; T-pins; Other
zh-TW: 相容插銷類型: 定型大頭針; 織物定型器/梳; 不可用大頭針固定; 免用大頭針 (重物/夾子); 防鏽大頭針; T 型大頭針; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva pinnityyppi: Pingotusneulat; Pingotuskammat; Ei neulattava; Neulaton (painot/klipsit); Ruostumattomat neulat; T-neulat; Muu
vi: Loại chân cắm tương thích: Ghim cố định (Blocking pins); Chặn đan/Lược; Không ghim được; Không dùng ghim (tạ/kẹp); Ghim chống gỉ; Ghim chữ T; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de știft compatibil: Pini de blocare; Blocatoare/piepteni pentru tricotaje; Nu poate fi fixat cu pini; Fără pini (greutăți/cleme); Pini inoxidabili; Ace în formă de T; Altele
cs: Kompatibilní typ konektoru: Špendlíky pro blokování; Blokovače/hřebeny na pletení; Nelze špendlit; Bez špendlíků (závaží/klipsy); Nerezové špendlíky; T-špendlíky; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de pino compatível: Alfinetes de bloqueio; Bloqueadores/pentes de tricot; Não fixável com alfinetes; Sem alfinetes (pesos/molas); Alfinetes antiferrugem; Alfinetes em T; Outro
th: ประเภทพินที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เข็มหมุดบล็อกกิ้ง; ตัวบล็อกงานนิตติ้ง/หวี; ปักหมุดไม่ได้; ไร้เข็มหมุด (ที่ถ่วงน้ำหนัก/คลิป); เข็มหมุดกันสนิม; เข็มหมุดรูปตัว T; อื่นๆ
de: Kompatible Nadelart: Spannnadeln; Spannkämme/Knit Blocker; Nicht feststeckbar; Ohne Nadeln (Gewichte/Klammern); Rostfreie Nadeln; T-Nadeln; Sonstige
ja: 対応ピンタイプ: ブロッキングピン; ニットブロッカー/コーム; ピン留め不可; ピンなし (ウェイト/クリップ); 防錆ピン; Tピン; その他
es: Tipo de pasador compatible: Alfileres de bloqueo; Bloqueadores/peines de punto; No se puede fijar con alfileres; Sin alfileres (pesas/clips); Alfileres inoxidables; Alfileres en T; Otro
nb: Kompatibel nåltype: Blokkeringsnåler; Strikkeblokkere/kammer; Kan ikke festes med nåler; Nålefri (vekter/klemmer); Rustfrie nåler; T-nåler; Annet
tr: Uyumlu pim tipi: Germe iğneleri; Örgü gergileri/tarakları; İğneyle tutturulamaz; İğnesiz (ağırlıklar/klipsler); Paslanmaz iğneler; T iğneler; Diğer
sv: Kompatibel nåltyp: Blockningsnålar; Blockningskammar; Går ej att nåla; Nålfri (vikter/klämmor); Rostfria nålar; T-nålar; Övrigt
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ kolíka: Napínacie špendlíky; Blokátory/hrebene na pleteniny; Nedá sa prišpendliť; Bez špendlíkov (závažia/spony); Nehrdzavejúce špendlíky; T-špendlíky; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis pin típus: Blokkoló tűk; Kötésblokkolók/fésűk; Nem tűzhető; Tű nélküli (súlyok/csipeszek); Rozsdamentes tűk; T-tűk; Egyéb
nl: Compatibel pintype: Opspanspelden; Breiblokkers/-kammen; Niet opspanbaar met spelden; Zonder spelden (gewichten/klemmen); Roestvrije spelden; T-spelden; Overig
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta zatiča: Bucike za napenjanje; Blokatorji/glavniki za pletenje; Ni primerno za pripenjanje; Brez bucik (uteži/sponke); Bucike, odporne proti rji; Bucike v obliki črke T; Drugo
it: Tipo di spillo compatibile: Spilli per bloccaggio; Bloccatori/pettini per maglia; Non appuntabile; Senza spilli (pesi/clip); Spilli antiruggine; Spilli a T; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип щифт: Игли за блокиране; Блокери за плетиво/гребени; Не може да се забожда; Без игли (тежести/щипки); Неръждаеми игли; Т-образни игли; Друго
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo smaigas: Blokavimo smeigtukai; Mezginių blokatoriai / šukos; Nesmeigiamas; Be smeigtukų (svarmenys / spaustukai); Nerūdijantys smeigtukai; T formos smeigtukai; Kita
pl: Zgodny typ styku: Szpilki do blokowania; Blokery do dzianin / grzebienie; Bez możliwości użycia szpilek; Bez szpilek (obciążniki/klipsy); Nierdzewne szpilki; Szpilki typu T; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta igle: Igle za blokiranje; Blokatori/češljevi za pletenje; Ne može se fiksirati iglama; Bez igala (utezi/kopče); Igle otporne na hrđu; T-igle; Ostalo
ru: Совместимый тип штифта: Булавки для блокировки; Блокаторы / гребни для вязания; Не скалывается булавками; Без булавок (грузы / зажимы); Нержавеющие булавки; T-образные булавки; Другое
ko: 호환 핀 유형: 블로킹 핀; 니트 블로커/빗; 핀 사용 불가; 핀리스(무게추/클립); 녹 방지 핀; T핀; 기타
da: Kompatibel nåletype: Blokeringstifter; Strikkeblokkere/-kamme; Kan ikke fastgøres med stifter; Uden stifter (vægte/klemmer); Rustfri stifter; T-stifter; Andet
el: Συμβατός τύπος πείρου: Καρφίτσες μπλοκαρίσματος; Μπλοκ/χτένια πλεξίματος; Δεν δέχεται καρφίτσες; Χωρίς καρφίτσες (βαρίδια/κλιπ); Ανοξείδωτες καρφίτσες; Καρφίτσες ταυ (T); Άλλο
zh-CN: 适用珠针类型: 定型针; 编织定型板/定型梳; 不可插针; 无针（重物/夹子）; 防锈针; T 型针; 其他
fr: Type de broche compatible: Épingles de blocage; Peignes/bloqueurs de tricot; Non épinglable; Sans épingles (poids/pinces); Épingles antirouille; Épingles en T; Autre